District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0558.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Clemency Board Waiver Authority Temporary Amendment Act of
2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 205 of the Clemency Board Establishment Act of 2018, effective
December 13, 2018 (D.C. Law 22-197; D.C. Official Code § 24-481.05), is amended by adding a
new subsection (f) to read as follows:
“(f) The Board may, upon written request of the applicant, grant a waiver of the
requirements of subsection (c)(1) of this section; provided, that:
“(1) The Board shall only grant a waiver under this subsection where the Board is
in receipt of notice from the Office of the Pardon Attorney that the Pardon Attorney or the
President of the United States has provided the applicant with a waiver of the 5-year requirement
pursuant to § 9-140.112 of the Department of Justice Manual;
“(2) The Board may decline to grant a waiver under this subsection even when the
Board is in receipt of the notice described in paragraph (1) of this subsection;
“(3) The Board shall not grant a waiver under this subsection when the applicant
is on probation, parole, or supervised release;
“(4) The Board may request additional information from the applicant to support
their request for a waiver of subsection (c)(1) of this section, which may include a request to
meet with the applicant to discuss their waiver request;
“(5) The Board shall provide the applicant with written notice of the Board’s
decision to grant or deny a waiver request pursuant to this subsection; and
“(6) Prior to the Board making a determination whether to grant a request for a
waiver pursuant to this subsection, the applicant’s application shall be deferred until a
determination is made.”.
1

Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Offiacial Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 60-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(2) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(2)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2